Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Powers and Miscellaneous Matters
Subsection (a)(xxxvii), relating to positions necessary for the efficient operation of the city or town, was applicable to a municipal garbage man under an “at-will,” as opposed to a fixed-term, contract. Siebken v. Wheatland, 700 P.2d 1236,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 490

(Wyo. 1985).

Discharge of a municipal garbage man was not in violation of this section

under the following facts: (1) there was a rule against “scavenging” known to the employee prior to his discharge; (2) when the employee was discharged, he was informed of a complaint against him which caused the discharge, after which he requested a hearing before the town council, at which he presented his position, admitting that he removed material from garbage at other times and took it home; and (3) the town council took the matter under advisement and agreed that the discharge was proper. Siebken v. Wheatland, 700 P.2d 1236,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 490

(Wyo. 1985).

Applied

in

Nollsch v. City of Rock Springs, 724 P.2d 447,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 603

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Neel v. City of Laramie, 488 P.2d 1056,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1971); Carlson v. Bratton, 681 P.2d 1333,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1984); Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Cheyenne, 2016 WY 125, 386 P.3d 329,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated

in

City Council v. Kreiling, 911 P.2d 1037,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Larsen v. City of Cheyenne, 626 P.2d 558,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1981); Town of Marbleton v. Town of Big Piney, 719 P.2d 1389,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1986); Kautza v. City of Cody, 812 P.2d 143,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1991); City of Green River v. Debernardi Constr. Co., 816 P.2d 1287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1991); Deromedi v. Town of Thermopolis, 2002 WY 69, 45 P.3d 1150,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2002); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

See “Occupation Taxes and the Employee,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 242 (1949).

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Natural Gas Consumers' Act of 1985: An Experiment in Controlling Natural Gas Prices and a Response to Indefinite Price Escalation Clauses,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 141 (1986).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of municipal regulation of solicitation of magazine subscriptions on streets, 9 ALR2d 728.

Public regulation and prohibition of sound amplifiers or loudspeaker broadcast in street, 10 ALR2d 627.

Granting or taking of lease by municipality as within authorization of purchase or acquisition thereof, 11 ALR2d 168.

Right of municipality or public to use of subsurface of street or highway for purpose other than sewers, pipes, conduits for wires, and the like, 11 ALR2d 180.

Exemption from taxation of municipally owned or operated stadium, auditorium and similar property, 16 ALR2d 1376.

Validity of regulations as to plumbers and plumbing, 22 ALR2d 816.

Compromise of claim for city taxes, 28 ALR2d 1425.

Release or compromise of city taxes by city attorney, 28 ALR2d 1425.

Capacity of municipality as trustee for maintenance or care of private cemetery, burial lot, tomb or monument, or erection of tomb or monument, 47 ALR2d 622.

Right to compel municipality to extend its water system, 48 ALR2d 1222.

Municipal power to condemn land for cemeteries, 54 ALR2d 1322.

Constitutionality of provisions for destruction of dogs running at large, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Exchange of real property, power of municipal corporation as to, 60 ALR2d 220.

Municipality's power to sell, lease or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein, 61 ALR2d 595.

Relative rights, as between municipality and abutting landowners, to minerals, oil and gas underlying streets, alleys or parks, 62 ALR2d 1311.

Validity of municipal regulation of storage or accumulation of lumber, straw, trash or similar inflammable material, 64 ALR2d 1040.

Right of state or its political subdivision to maintain action in another state for support and maintenance of defendant's child, parent or dependent in plaintiff's institution, 67 ALR2d 771.

Parking meters, permissible use of funds from, 83 ALR2d 625.

Pledging parking meter revenues as unlawful relinquishment of governmental power, 83 ALR2d 649.

Power of municipal corporation to submit to arbitration, 20 ALR3d 569.

Validity and construction of anti-water pollution statutes or ordinances, 32 ALR3d 215.

Power of eminent domain as between state and subdivision or agency thereof, or as between different subdivisions or agencies themselves, 35 ALR3d 1293.

Validity of municipal regulation of aircraft flight paths or altitudes, 36 ALR3d 1314.

Cost of substitute facilities as measure of compensation paid to state or municipality for condemnation of public property, 40 ALR3d 143.

Validity and construction of municipal ordinances regulating community antenna television service (CATV), 41 ALR3d 384.

Propriety of injunctive relief against diversion of water by municipal corporation or public utility, 42 ALR3d 426.

Validity and construction of state and municipal enactments regulating lobbying, 42 ALR3d 1046.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance providing for repair or destruction of residential building by public authorities at owner's expense, 43 ALR3d 916.

Power of municipal corporation to limit exclusive use of designated lanes or streets to buses and taxicabs, 43 ALR3d 1374.

Estoppel of municipality as to encroachments upon public streets, 44 ALR3d 257.

Power of municipal corporation to lease or sublet property owned or leased by it, 47 ALR3d 19.

Standing of municipal corporation or other governmental body to attack zoning of land lying outside its borders, 49 ALR3d 1126.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance forbidding treatment in health clubs or massage salons by person of the opposite sex, 51 ALR3d 936.

Validity of municipal regulation more restrictive than state regulation as to time for selling or serving intoxicating liquor, 51 ALR3d 1061.

Validity and construction of regulations dealing with misrepresentation in the sale of kosher food, 52 ALR3d 959.

Power of municipality to charge nonresidents higher fees than residents for use of municipal facilities, 57 ALR3d 998.

Validity of statute or ordinance making it an offense to consume or have alcoholic beverages in open package in motor vehicle, 57 ALR3d 1071.

Validity and construction of curfew statute, ordinance or proclamation, 59 ALR3d 321, 83 ALR4th 1056.

Right of municipality to refuse services provided by it to resident for failure of resident to pay for other unrelated services, 60 ALR3d 714.

Gambling: construction and application of state or municipal enactments relating to policy or numbers games, 70 ALR3d 897.

Liability for negligence in carrying out governmentally required inspection of motor vehicle, 70 ALR3d 1239.

Validity of regulation providing for reserved parking spaces or parking priority on publicly owned property for members of a designated group, 70 ALR3d 1323.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring return deposits on soft drink or similar containers, 73 ALR3d 1105.

Right of owner of land not originally taken or purchased as part of adjacent project to recover, on enlargement of project to include adjacent land, enhanced value of property by reason of proximity to original land, 95 ALR3d 752.

Bells, carillons and the like as nuisance, 95 ALR3d 1268.

Recovery of exemplary or punitive damages from municipal corporation, 1 ALR4th 448.

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury or death resulting from design, construction, or failure to warn of narrow bridge, 2 ALR4th 635.

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances prohibiting profanity or profane swearing or cursing, 5 ALR4th 956.

Right of municipal corporation to review of unfavorable decision in action or prosecution for violation of ordinance — modern status, 11 ALR4th 399.

Factors affecting award of operating certificate, franchise, or license under state cable television act, 15 ALR4th 961.

Validity of zoning or building regulations restricting mobile homes or trailers to established mobile home or trailer parks, 17 ALR4th 106.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance protecting historical landmarks, 18 ALR4th 990.

Liability, in motor vehicle-related cases, of governmental entity for injury, death, or property damage resulting from defect or obstruction in shoulder of street or highway, 19 ALR4th 532.

State or municipal towing impounding, or destruction of motor vehicles parked or abandoned on streets or highways, 32 ALR4th 728.

Private improvement of land dedicated but not used as street as estopping public rights, 36 ALR4th 625.

Windmill as nuisance, 36 ALR4th 1159.

State and local regulation of private landowner's disposal of solid waste on own property, 37 ALR4th 635.

Liability of governmental entity to builder or developer for negligent issuance of building permit subsequently suspended or revoked, 41 ALR4th 99.

Construction of provisions of statute or ordinance governing occasion, time or manner of summary destruction of domestic animals by public authorities, 42 ALR4th 839.

Validity of state or municipal tax or license fee upon occupation of practicing law, 50 ALR4th 467.

Validity, construction and application of statutes or ordinances involved in prosecutions for possession of bookmaking paraphernalia, 51 ALR4th 796.

Validity, construction and effect of statute requiring consultation with, or approval of, local governmental unit prior to locating group home, halfway house or similar community residence for the mentally ill, 51 ALR4th 1096.

Validity, construction and application of statutes or ordinances involved in prosecutions for transmission of wagers or wagering information related to bookmaking, 53 ALR4th 801.

Landlord and tenant: violation of statute or ordinance requiring landlord to furnish specified facilities or service as ground of liability for injury resulting from tenant's attempt to deal with deficiency, 63 ALR4th 883.

State and local government liability for injury or death of bicyclist due to defect or obstruction in public bicycle path, 68 ALR4th 204.

Municipal liability for negligent fire inspection and subsequent enforcement, 69 ALR4th 739.

Liability of private landowner for vegetation obscuring view at highway or street intersection, 69 ALR4th 1092.

Validity and construction of statute, ordinance or regulation applying to specific dog breeds, such as “pit bulls” or “bull terriers,” 80 ALR4th 70.

Right of one governmental subdivision to challenge annexation proceedings by another such subdivision, 17 ALR5th 195.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring installation of automatic sprinklers, 63 ALR5th 517.

Effect of broadcaster's employment practices on renewal of broadcaster's television license, 57 ALR Fed 16.

Judicial review under § 16 of Noise Control Act of 1972 (42 USC § 4915) of action of Administrator of Environmental Protection Agency, 59 ALR Fed 705.

Closing or relocation of medical facility serving large numbers of minority citizens as violative of Title VI of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000d et seq.), 69 ALR Fed 588.

Validity, under federal constitution, of regulations, rules or statutes requiring random or mass drug testing of public employees or persons whose employment is regulated by state, local or federal government, 86 ALR Fed 420.